Maryland, session 2025, SB0620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–503.
(a) In each county in the first seven judicial circuits there shall be the number of
resident judges of the circuit court set forth below, including the judge or judges provided
for by the Constitution:
(1) Allegany ................................................................................................... 2
(2) Anne Arundel ........................................................................................ 13
(3) Baltimore County .................................................................................. 21
(4) Calvert ..................................................................................................... 3
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0620*

SENATE BILL 620
(5) Caroline ................................................................................................... 1
(6) Carroll...................................................................................................... 4
(7) Cecil ......................................................................................................... 4
(8) Charles .................................................................................................... 5
(9) Dorchester ............................................................................................... 1
(10) Frederick ................................................................................................. 6
(11) Garrett ..................................................................................................... 1
(12) Harford .................................................................................................... 6
(13) Howard .................................................................................................... 5
(14) Kent ......................................................................................................... 1
(15) Montgomery .......................................................................................... 24
(16) Prince George’s ..................................................................................... 25
(17) Queen Anne’s .......................................................................................... 1
(18) St. Mary’s .......................................................................................... [3] 4
(19) Somerset .................................................................................................. 1
(20) Talbot ....................................................................................................... 1
(21) Washington ............................................................................................ 6
(22) Wicomico .................................................................................................. 4
(23) Worcester ................................................................................................. 3
(b) In Baltimore City there shall be 35 resident judges of the Circuit Court for
Baltimore City.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.